Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2407
Certified preceptor, defined.

Certified preceptor means a person who is currently licensed by the State of Nebraska as a nursing home administrator, has three years of experience as a nursing home administrator, has practiced within the last two years in a nursing home, and is approved by the department to supervise an administrator-in-training or a person in a mentoring program.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 822.